Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.300

Contract to issue conditional federal employer identification numbers, credentials, and documents—Issuance in conjunction with license applications.

(1) The director may contract with the federal internal revenue service, or other appropriate federal agency, to issue conditional federal employer identification numbers, or other federal credentials or documents, at specified offices and locations of the agency in conjunction with any application for state licenses under this chapter.

(2) To the extent permitted by any contract entered under subsection (1) of this section, the department may contract, under chapter 39.34 RCW, with any agency of state or local government which is participating in the master licensing program to issue conditional federal employer identification numbers, or other federal credentials or documents, in conjunction with applications for state licenses under this chapter.

[ 1997 c 51 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—1997 c 51: "The legislature intends to simplify the process of registering and licensing businesses in this state by authorizing state agencies to provide consolidated forms, instructions, service locations, and other operations whenever coordination of these functions would benefit individual businesses and the business community of this state. To further this goal, agencies participating in the master business license program should be able to contract with the federal internal revenue service, or other appropriate federal agency, to issue a conditional federal employer identification number, or other federal credentials or documents, at the same time that a business applies for registration or licensing with any state agency." [ 1997 c 51 s 1.]